Utah statutes.
63C-7-304.   Reserve funds for debt service.
(1)  To assure the continued operation and solvency of the Utah Communications
Agency Network for the carrying out of its purpose, the Utah Communications
Agency Network may establish reserve funds necessary to secure the payment of
debt service on its bonds.
(2)  The resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds shall specify the
minimum amount that is required to be on deposit in the reserve funds.
(3)  The chair shall annually, on or before December 1, certify to the
governor, the director of finance, and to each member the amount, if any,
required to restore the funds to their required funding levels.
(4) (a)  The governor may request from the Legislature an appropriation of the
amount certified in Subsection (3) to restore the reserve funds to their
required funding levels or to meet any projected principal or interest payment
deficiency.  Any amount appropriated shall be repaid to the General Fund of
the state in excess of the amounts which the executive committee determines
will keep it self-supporting.
(b)  The executive committee shall adjust the fees of the members so that the
state is repaid for the amount appropriated in Subsection (4)(a) within 18
months after the state has paid the deficit.
(5)  The members are jointly responsible for 1/2 the amount certified in
Subsection (3) to restore the reserve funds to their required funding levels.
The executive committee may request from each member monies proportionate to
their participation in the network to restore the funding level.  Any amount
paid by the members shall be proportionally repaid to them from 1/2 of any
monies in excess of the amounts which the executive committee determines will
keep it self-supporting.
